North Dakota, session 69, SB2227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-52-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. a. Every eligible participating political subdivision employee, at the time the political
subdivision joins the plan mustshall so state in writing if the employee concurs in the plan
and all future eligible employees of the participating political subdivision are participating
members in the plan and must be enrolled in the plan within the first month of
employment.
b. Except as otherwise provided by law, every other eligible governmental unit employee of
a participating governmental unit is a participating member in the plan and must be
enrolled in the plan within the first month of employment. An employee who was not
enrolled in the retirement system when eligible to participate must be enrolled
immediately upon notice of the employee's eligibility, unless the employee waives in
writing the employee's right to participate for the previous time of eligibility, to avoid
contributing to the fund for past service.
c. An employee who is eligible for normal retirement who accepts a retirement benefit under
this chapter and who subsequently becomes employed with a participating employer
other than the employer with which the employee was employed with at the time the
employee retired under this chapter may, before being re-enrolled in the retirement plan
within the first month of employment, elect to permanently waive future participation in
the retirement plan and the retiree health program and maintain that employee's
retirement status. An employee making this election is not required to make any future
employee contributions to the public employees retirement system nor is the employee's
employer required to make any further contributions on behalf of that employee.
d. An employee eligible for normal retirement who accepts a retirement benefit under this
chapter and subsequently becomes employed with the same participating employer the
employee was employed with at the time the employee retired under this chapter may
not participate in the retirement plan or the retiree health program and may maintain that
employee's retirement status if the employee is appointed by an elected state official to
an unclassified state position for the duration of the elected official's term until a
successor is appointed.
SECTION 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICATION. This Act applies retroactively to December 14, 2024.
SECTION 3. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2227 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2227 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 6 Absent 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State